Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2843
Public health clinic worker, defined.

Public health clinic worker means a person in a public health clinic with a delegated dispensing permit who has completed the approved training and has demonstrated proficiency to perform the task of dispensing authorized refills of contraceptives pursuant to a written prescription.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 939;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 39.